Utah statutes.
20A-7-301.   Referendum -- Signature requirements -- Submission to voters.

(1) (a)  A person seeking to have a law passed by the Legislature submitted to a vote of the people shall obtain:

(i)  legal signatures equal to 10% of the cumulative total of all votes cast for all candidates for governor at the last regular general election at which a governor was elected; and

(ii)  from each of at least 15 counties, legal signatures equal to 10% of the total of all votes cast in that county for all candidates for governor at the last regular general election at which a governor was elected.

(b)  When the lieutenant governor declares a referendum petition sufficient under this part, the governor shall issue an executive order that:

(i)  directs that the referendum be submitted to the voters at the next regular general election; or

(ii)  calls a special election according to the requirements of Section 20A-1-203 and directs that the referendum be submitted to the voters at that special election.

(2)  When a referendum petition has been declared sufficient, the law that is the subject of the petition does not take effect unless and until it is approved by a vote of the people at a regular general election or a statewide special election.

(3)  The lieutenant governor shall provide to any interested person from the official canvass of the last regular general election at which a governor was elected:

(a)  the cumulative total of all votes cast for all candidates for governor; and

(b)  for each county, the total of all votes cast in that county for all candidates for governor.

